Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 587, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 587. The fee for such examinations shall be set by
rules promulgated by the Board of Examiners in Optometry, not to be
less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and not to exceed Two
Hundred Dollars ($200.00), and a yearly license fee set by rules
promulgated by the Board of Examiners in Optometry, not to exceed
Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00),
shall be paid each fiscal year by all persons holding a license to
practice optometry in this state, and shall be paid not later than
the 30th day of June of each year. In the event of default of
payment of such license fee by any person, his or her certificate
shall be revoked by the Board of Examiners who shall take such
action only after notifying the person in default by registered mail
and allowing that person fifteen (15) days in which to comply with
this requirement. The Board shall be paid travel expenses as
provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act, Section 500.1 et
seq. of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The secretary-treasurer
shall receive compensation fixed by the Board, not to exceed Two
Hundred Dollars ($200.00) per month. All fees and charges collected

by the secretary-treasurer of the Board shall be paid on the first
day of each month into a revolving fund in the State Treasury to be
designated as the "Optometry Board Revolving Fund". This fund shall
consist of all monies received by the Board of Optometry other than
appropriated funds. The revolving fund shall be a continuing fund
not subject to fiscal year limitations and shall be under the
control and management of the Board of Optometry. Expenditures from
this fund shall be made pursuant to the purposes of Sections 581
through 606 of this title and without legislative approval.
Warrants for expenditures shall be drawn by the State Treasurer
based on claims signed by an authorized employee or employees of the
Board of Optometry and approved for payment by the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1819 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1819 Page 3